Indiana, session 2026, SB221.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-19-4-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2022,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) The state health commissioner or the
commissioner's designated public health authority who is a licensed
prescriber may, shall, as part of the individual's official capacity, issue
a standing order, prescription, or protocol that allows a pharmacist to
administer, or dispense, test, treat, or prescribe any of the following:
(1) An immunization that is recommended by the federal Centers
for Disease Control and Prevention Advisory Committee on
Immunization Practices approved or authorized by the federal
Food and Drug Administration for individuals who are not less
than eleven (11) years of age.
(2) A smoking cessation product. However, the pharmacist must
inform the patient that the patient must have a follow-up
consultation with the patient's licensed prescriber.
(3) Point of care testing that has been approved or authorized
by the federal Food and Drug Administration and categorized
2026 IN 221—LS 6704/DI 104


as Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments
(CLIA)-waived under 42 U.S.C. 263a for the following
conditions:
(A) COVID-19.
(B) Group B streptococcus.
(C) Respiratory syncytial virus (RSV).
(D) Influenza.
(4) A prescription for, including the dispensing of, a
medication that meets the following:
(A) Is indicated for the treatment of a diagnosed condition.
(B) Is authorized by the federal Food and Drug
Administration for treatment of the diagnosed condition.
(C) Is included on a protocol list that is established by the
Indiana board of pharmacy, in consultation with the state
department.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a pharmacist. The state health
commissioner or the commissioner's designated public health authority
who is a licensed prescriber may, as part of the individual's official
capacity, issue a standing order, prescription, or protocol that allows an
individual who is licensed, certified, or registered by a board (as
defined in IC 25-1-9-1), and if within the individual's scope of practice,
to administer or dispense an immunization that is recommended by the
federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices approved or authorized by the
federal Food and Drug Administration for individuals who are not
less than eleven (11) years of age.
(c) A standing order described in subsection (a) or (b) or (e) must
include the following:
(1) The purpose of the order.
(2) The eligible recipients.
(3) The geographic area covered by the standing order.
(4) The procedure for administering or dispensing the
immunization or product.
(5) A timeline for renewing or updating the standing order.
(d) The state health commissioner or designated public health
authority who issues a standing order, prescription, or protocol under
subsection (a) or (b) or (e) is immune from civil liability related to the
issuing of the standing order, prescription, or protocol.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (a) and subsection (b), the state
health commissioner or the commissioner's designated public health
authority may issue a standing order, prescription, or protocol to
administer or dispense an immunization that is recommended by the
2026 IN 221—LS 6704/DI 104


federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices for individuals who are at least
five (5) years of age. Nothing in this subsection authorizes the state
health commissioner or the commissioner's designated public health
authority to:
(1) require an individual to receive an immunization for
COVID-19; or
(2) waive or otherwise allow a minor to receive an immunization
without the consent of the parent or guardian as required under
IC 16-36-1.
This subsection expires at the conclusion of the federal public health
emergency concerning COVID-19 that was renewed on October 15,
2021, or any subsequent renewal of the declared federal public health
emergency concerning COVID-19.
SECTION 2. IC 25-26-24.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 24.5. Prescribing, Testing, and Treating by
Pharmacists by Standing Order
Sec. 1. A pharmacist may administer, dispense, test, treat, or
prescribe any of the following through a standing order issued by
the commissioner of the Indiana department of health under
IC 16-19-4-11:
(1) An immunization that is approved or authorized by the
federal Food and Drug Administration for individuals who
are not less than eleven (11) years of age.
(2) A smoking cessation product. However, the pharmacist
must inform the patient that the patient must have a follow-up
consultation with the patient's licensed prescriber.
(3) Point of care testing that has been approved or authorized
by the federal Food and Drug Administration and categorized
as Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments
(CLIA)-waived under 42 U.S.C. 263a for the following
conditions:
(A) COVID-19.
(B) Group B streptococcus.
(C) Respiratory syncytial virus (RSV).
(D) Influenza.
(4) A prescription for, including the dispensing of, a
medication that meets the following:
(A) Is indicated for the treatment of a diagnosed condition.
(B) Is authorized by the federal Food and Drug
2026 IN 221—LS 6704/DI 104


Administration for treatment of the diagnosed condition.
(C) Is included on a protocol list that is established by the
Indiana board of pharmacy, in consultation with the
Indiana department of health.
Sec. 2. A pharmacist acting under a standing order described in
IC 16-19-4-11(a)(3) and IC 16-19-4-11(a)(4) shall do the following:
(1) Complete a continuing education course from provider
approved by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy
Education (ACPE).
(2) Maintain records of testing and treatment for at least
seven (7) years.
(3) Report positive test results, as required by the Indiana
department of health.
(4) Provide the patient with written information advising the
patient to follow up with the patient's primary care provider
or another licensed practitioner.
(5) If the patient identifies a primary care provider and the
patient consents, transmit a summary of the visit, including
any test results and prescribed medication, to the identified
primary care provider within a reasonable period of time and
in a manner that is consistent with federal and state privacy
laws.
Sec. 3. A pharmacy technician or pharmacy intern registered
under this article may perform specimen collection and administer
a test described in section 1(3) of this chapter if the following are
met:
(1) The collection or administration is conducted under the
direct supervision of a pharmacist.
(2) The pharmacist is immediately available on the premises.
(3) The pharmacist remains responsible for:
(A) the interpretation of the test;
(B) the prescribing or dispensing of any medication in
compliance with section 1 of this chapter; and
(C) compliance with the reporting and record keeping
requirements set forth in section 2 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. (a) The Indiana board of pharmacy shall adopt rules
under IC 4-22-2 to implement this chapter, including rules
concerning the following:
(1) Standardized protocols.
(2) Reporting requirements.
(3) Age and dosage limitations.
(4) Continuing education requirements.
2026 IN 221—LS 6704/DI 104


(b) The Indiana board of pharmacy shall consult with the
commissioner of the Indiana department of health in the
development of the rules described in subsection (a).
Sec. 5. (a) This section does not apply to an act or omission that
constitutes gross negligence, willful or wanton misconduct, or
intentional wrongdoing.
(b) A pharmacist who acts in good faith in compliance with a
statewide standing order described in this chapter and the rules
adopted under section 4 of this chapter is immune from civil
liability for the following:
(1) An act or omission related to the ordering, administering,
or interpretation of a test described in section 1(3) of this
chapter.
(2) The prescribing and dispensing of medication described in
section 1(4) of this chapter.
SECTION 3. IC 34-30-2.1-383.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 383.2. IC 25-26-24.5-5
(Concerning a pharmacist ordering, administering, or interpreting
tests and the prescribing and dispensing of medication).
SECTION 4. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "board" refers to the Indiana board of pharmacy.
(b) Before July 1, 2026, the board shall begin the administrative
rulemaking process to adopt rules to implement IC 25-26-24.5, as
added by this act.
(c) This SECTION expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 5. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 221—LS 6704/DI 104